New York, session 2025-2026, A3800.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 176.85 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 176.85 Staging a construction site accident. 4 A person is guilty of staging a construction site accident when, with 5 intent to commit and in furtherance of a fraudulent insurance act, such 6 person enters a construction site and intentionally stages an accident 7 on such site with the intent to file an insurance claim, or directs, 8 hires, requests, encourages, orchestrates or invites another individual 9 to enter a construction site and intentionally stage an accident on such 10 site with the intent to file an insurance claim. 11 Staging a construction site accident is a class E felony. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07801-01-5